North Carolina, session 2025, SB846.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The following property, identified by Nash County Parcel
Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the Town of Red Oak:
382110465092
382115547627
SECTION 1.(b) This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town of
Red Oak for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of this
act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as though
the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Red Oak.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the territory
described by Section 1(a) of this act as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
*S846-v-1*